Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,153
Act, how cited.

Sections 83-4,153 to 83-4,165 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Correctional Health Care Services Act.

Laws 2001, LB 154, § 1.